Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1821
Franchise or certificate of convenience; restrictions.

No franchise or certificate of convenience granted to a jurisdictional utility shall be assigned, transferred, or leased unless the assignment, transfer, or lease has been approved by the commission as being consistent with the public interest.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 21.